Lecture7/danish.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
+Indef  ! indefinite form
+Def    ! definite form
! Remember to list all your flag diacritics as multichar symbols, too

LEXICON Root
Articles ;

LEXICON Articles
NounStems ;  ! no article
:et_    AdjStems ;   ! indefinite article (a/an)
:det_   AdjStems ;   ! definite article (the)

LEXICON AdjStems
NounStems ;     ! no adjective attribute
dejlig  AdjSuffixes ;   ! nice
god     AdjSuffixes ;   ! good
gul     AdjSuffixes ;   ! yellow
ny      AdjSuffixes ;   ! new
stor    AdjSuffixes ;   ! big

LEXICON AdjSuffixes
t_      NounStems ;     ! indefinite adj. suffix
t_:e_   NounStems ;     ! definite adj. suffix

LEXICON NounStems
brev    NounSuffixes ;  ! letter
hegn    NounSuffixes ;  ! fence
fly     NounSuffixes ;  ! plane
hus     NounSuffixes ;  ! house
tog     NounSuffixes ;  ! train

LEXICON NounSuffixes
+Indef: # ;             ! no noun suffix
+Def:   # ;             ! no noun suffix
+Def:et # ;             ! definite suffix

END
